North Dakota, session 69, HB1195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subdivision k of subsection 2 of section 39-06.1-06 of the
North Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
k. A violation of section 39-10-46 or 39-10-46.1, a fee of one hundredfive hundred
dollars.
Page No. 1 25.0610.01000